Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 1. Eminent Domain and Damages.

§ 33.2-1000.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Certificate”
means an instrument that, when recorded in the office of the clerk of the circuit court wherein condemnation proceedings are pending or are to be instituted by the Commissioner of Highways, terminates the interest or estate of the owner of the property described therein and vests defeasible title to such property or interest or estate of the owner in the Commonwealth. “Certificate” includes a certificate of deposit and a certificate of take.

“Certificate of deposit”
means a certificate issued by the Commissioner of Highways and countersigned by the State Treasurer, stating that any sum or sums designated therein shall be paid pursuant to the order of the court, and filed by the Commissioner of Highways with the court wherein condemnation proceedings are pending or are to be instituted in lieu of the payment of funds into court, as provided in subdivision A 2 of §

33.2-1019

.

“Certificate of take”
means a certificate recorded by the Commissioner of Highways with the court wherein condemnation proceedings are pending or are to be instituted, in connection with which the Commissioner of Highways has deposited funds with the court as provided in subdivision A 1 of §

33.2-1019

.

“Owner”
means any person owning land, buildings, structures, or improvements upon land where such ownership is of record in the land records of the clerk’s office of the circuit court of the city or county where the property is located. “Owner” does not include trustees or beneficiaries under a deed of trust, any person with a security interest in the property, or any person with a judgment or lien against the property. In proceedings instituted by the Commissioner of Highways under Title 25.1 or this title, “owner” includes persons owning structures or improvements for which an outdoor advertising permit has been issued by the Commissioner of Highways pursuant to §

33.2-1208

. This definition of owner shall not alter in any way the valuation of such land, buildings, structures, or improvements under existing law.

“Public highway”
means a highway, road, or street. When applicable, “public highway” includes a bridge, ferry, causeway, landing, or wharf.

History.

2014, c. 805.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-404 Certificate of Take; No. 6-405 Certificate of Take - Another Form; No. 6-406 Petition for Condemnation by County for Roadway.

§ 33.2-1001.
Power to acquire lands, etc.; conveyance to municipality after acquisition; property owners to be informed and briefed.

The Commissioner of Highways is vested with the power to acquire by purchase, gift, or power of eminent domain such lands, structures, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other interest in lands, including lands under water and riparian rights, of any person, association, partnership, corporation, or municipality or political subdivision, deemed necessary for the construction, reconstruction, alteration, maintenance, and repair of the public highways of the Commonwealth and for these purposes and all other purposes incidental thereto may condemn property in fee simple and rights-of-way of such width and on such routes and grades and locations as the Commissioner of Highways may deem requisite and suitable, including locations for permanent, temporary, continuous, periodical, or future use and rights or easements incidental thereto and lands, quarries, and locations, with rights of ingress and egress, containing gravel, clay, sand, stone, rock, timber, and any other road materials deemed useful or necessary in carrying out the purposes of this subsection.

The Commissioner of Highways is authorized to exercise the power provided under subsection A within municipalities on projects that are constructed with state or federal participation if requested by the municipality concerned. Whenever the Commissioner of Highways has acquired property pursuant to a request of the municipality, he shall convey the title so acquired to the municipality, except that rights-of-way or easements acquired for the relocation of a railroad, public utility company, or public service corporation or company, another political subdivision, or a cable television company in connection with such projects shall be conveyed to that entity in accordance with §

33.2-1014

. The authority for such conveyance shall apply to acquisitions made by the Commissioner of Highways pursuant to previous requests as well as any subsequent request.

Any offer by the Commissioner of Highways to a property owner with respect to payment of compensation for the prospective taking of property and damage to property not taken incident to the purposes of this section shall separately state (i) the property to be taken and the amount of compensation offered therefor and (ii) the nature of the prospective damage or damages and the amount of compensation offered for each such prospective damage. The amount of the offer shall not be less than the amount of the approved appraisal of the fair market value of such property, in accordance with the provisions of §

25.1-417

, or the current assessed value of such property for real estate tax purposes, unless the property has physically changed in a material and substantial way since the current assessment date such that the real estate tax assessment no longer represents a fair valuation of the property, when the entire parcel for which the assessment is made is to be acquired, whichever is greater. Any such appraisal used by the Commissioner of Highways as the basis for an offer shall be prepared by a real estate appraiser licensed in accordance with Chapter 20.1 (§ 54.1-2009 et seq.) of Title 54.1.

The Commissioner of Highways shall also provide to a property owner a copy of any report of status of title prepared in connection with such acquisition if prepared pursuant to subsection D of §

25.1-204

.

In negotiating with a property owner with respect to payment for prospective damage to property not taken incident to the purposes of this section, the Commissioner of Highways shall ensure that such property owner or his authorized representative is properly informed as to the type and amount of foreseeable damage or enhancement. Adequate briefing includes (i) the giving of plats and profiles of the project, showing cuts and fills, together with elevations and grades and (ii) explanation, in lay terms, of all proposed changes in profile, elevation, and grade of the highway and entrances, including the elevations of proposed pavement and shoulders, both center and edges, with relation to the present pavement and approximate grade of entrances to the property.

Any option or deed executed by the property owner shall contain a statement that the plans as they affect his property have been fully explained. However, the requirements of this section with respect to information and briefing and the acknowledgment thereof in options and deeds shall in no way be construed to affect the validity of any conveyance, to create any right to compensation, or to limit the authority of the Commissioner of Highways to reasonably control the use of public highways so as to promote the public health, safety, and welfare.

Nothing in this section shall make evidence of tax assessments admissible as proof of value in an eminent domain proceeding.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-57; 1956, c. 152; 1966, c. 65; 1968, c. 700; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-89; 1976, c. 430; 1993, c. 67; 1999, c. 88; 2000, c. 1029; 2002, c. 878; 2003, c. 940; 2013, c. 764; 2014, c. 805.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2000, cc. 370 and
452, c. 1 provide: “Notwithstanding any provision of Article 7 ( § 33.1-89 et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 33.1 of the Code of Virginia, the Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner [now Commissioner of Highways] shall not exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire any portion of the property of an existing commercial establishment or any interest therein if the sole purpose of such acquisition is to control or limit access to commercial establishments located within 300 feet of any segment of the interstate highway system, except to the extent necessary to meet minimum federal requirements in order for the Commonwealth to be eligible to receive federal funds for interstate highway construction.

“At those interstate highway interchange locations where the value of land, buildings, and improvements within 300 feet of an interstate ramp terminal has a fair market value of $1 million or more, the Commonwealth Transportation Board shall designate those interchanges as ‘urban,’ provided such designation does not conflict with any federal statute or regulation.”

Law Review.

For Washington & Lee Law Alumni Association Student Notes Colloquium, “If a Tree Falls in a Roadway, Is Anyone Liable?: Proposing the Duty of Reasonable Care for Virginia’s Road-Maintaining Entities,” see 76 Wash & Lee L. Rev. 509 (2019).

§ 33.2-1002.
Limitation on power of eminent domain.

No property that is within an agricultural and forestal district as provided by the Agricultural and Forestal Districts Act (§

15.2-4300

et seq.) shall be condemned by the Commissioner of Highways except in accordance with §

15.2-4313

.

History.

1977, c. 681, § 33.1-89.1; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1003.
Additional power to acquire lands.

The Commissioner of Highways may use the powers granted in this title to acquire needed property interests for purposes set out in Article 5 (§

33.2-281

et seq.) of Chapter 2.

History.

1992, c. 167, § 33.1-89.2; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1004.
Plans for acquisition of rights-of-way.

Subject to compliance with applicable federal regulations, the Commissioner of Highways shall establish a plan for identification and acquisition of rights-of-way that may be needed within the corridors designated on the Statewide Transportation Plan.

History.

2013, cc. 585, 646, § 33.1-89.3; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1005.
Acquisition of real property that may be needed for transportation projects; sale of certain real property.

When the Commissioner of Highways determines that any real property will be required in connection with the construction of a transportation project, or project as defined in §

33.2-1700

, within a period not exceeding 12 years for the Interstate System or 10 years for any other highway system or transportation project from the time of such determination, and that it would be advantageous to the Commonwealth to acquire such real property, he may proceed to do so. The Commissioner of Highways may lease any real property so acquired to the owner from whom such real property is acquired, if requested by him, and, if not so requested, to another person upon such terms and conditions as in the judgment of the Commissioner of Highways may be in the public interest. If the transportation project contemplated, or project as defined in §

33.2-1700

, has not been let to contract or construction has not commenced within a period of 20 years from the date of the acquisition of such property, and a need for the use of such property has not been determined for any alternative transportation project, then upon written demand of the owner, or his heirs or assigns, that is received (i) within 90 days from the expiration of such 20-year period or such extension as provided for in this section or (ii) within 30 days from publication of a notice of the intent of the Commissioner of Highways to dispose of such property in a newspaper of general circulation in the political subdivision in which the property is located and the Commissioner of Highways shall notify to the extent practical, the last known owner of said property by certified mail, that such property shall be reconveyed by the Commonwealth to such owner, or his heirs or assigns, upon repayment of the original purchase price, without interest. If the reconveyance is not concluded within six months from receipt by the Commissioner of Highways of a written demand, the reconveyance opportunity shall lapse. However, the 20-year limit established by this section within which the Department must let to contract or begin construction in order to avoid reconveyance shall be extended by the number of days of delay caused by litigation involving the project or by the failure of the Commonwealth to receive anticipated federal funds for such project. The 20-year limit may also be extended in those instances in which a project is included in the Six-Year Improvement Program of the Board or the Six-Year Improvement Program for secondary highways prepared by the county boards of supervisors and in which steps have been taken to move forward. No such reconveyance shall be required for rights-of-way acquired for future transportation improvements at the request of local governing bodies or for rights-of-way acquired for state construction designed to provide future additional lanes or other enhancements to existing transportation facilities.

If any real property acquired under this article for use in connection with a transportation project is subsequently offered for sale by the Department and such property is suitable for independent development, the Department shall offer the property for sale at fair market value to the owner from whom it was acquired before such property is offered for sale to any other person. The Commissioner of Highways shall notify, to the extent practicable, the last known owner of such property by certified mail, and the owner shall have 30 days from the date of such notice to advise the Commissioner of Highways of his interest in purchasing the property. If the purchase of the property by the owner from whom it was acquired is not concluded within six months from receipt by the Commissioner of Highways of a written notice, the purchase opportunity shall lapse. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to property to which the provisions of subsection A do not apply.

Subsection B shall not apply to Department projects carried out in cooperation with the United States Army Corps of Engineers as part of a nonstructural flood control project. If property acquired by the Commonwealth under this article in connection with a project is no longer needed by the Commonwealth for such project, such property shall be conveyed to the locality in which such project is located and used in connection with the redevelopment. If such property is not used for economic development, then the property shall revert to the Commonwealth and may be used for any purposes deemed appropriate, including resale.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-57.1; 1958, c. 345; 1964, c. 261; 1970, cc. 110, 322, § 33.1-90; 1972, c. 396; 1973, c. 430; 1983, c. 146; 1988, c. 80; 1992, c. 108; 1997, c. 93; 1998, c. 426; 2000, c. 998; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1006.
Reconveyance where property deemed suitable for mass transit purposes.

If any real property that, under the provisions of §

33.2-1005

, is or may become eligible for reconveyance is deemed suitable for the mass transit purposes of a public agency, authority, instrumentality, or public service corporation or company, and such entity has submitted tentative plans to the Commissioner of Highways for a mass transit facility utilizing such real property, or portions thereof, and, prior to the eligibility of that real property for reconveyance under this article, the Commissioner of Highways has approved the use of such real property for mass transit purposes, such real estate shall not be eligible for reconveyance under those sections. Upon the formulation of final plans for the facility, the Commissioner of Highways is authorized to enter into an agreement with any such entity for the conveyance of the property to such entity. Any property or portions thereof not necessary for the mass transit facility shall become eligible for reconveyance under the provisions of §

33.2-1005

upon a determination of the final plans for the facility. Such agreement shall provide for the payment to the Commonwealth of an amount equal to that expended by the Commonwealth in the acquisition of such real property, including proportionate administrative costs and costs under the federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, as amended. Upon payment of the agreed consideration, the Commissioner of Highways shall convey the specified property to the facility. However, if construction of such planned facilities is not commenced within 10 years from the date of the agreement between the transit agency and the Commissioner of Highways, the persons who would otherwise have been authorized to petition for reconveyance under §

33.2-1005

or their heirs or assigns may seek reconveyance under the same procedures and on the same basis as established in §

33.2-1005

.

This section shall not compel the Commissioner of Highways to convey any such property to such entities in contravention of any federal law or regulation affecting the disposition of real property acquired for highway purposes when such property is no longer needed for such purposes when such property has been acquired with federal funding participation.

History.

1976, c. 724, § 33.1-90.2; 1992, c. 108; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1007.
Authority to acquire entire tract of land, or parcel thereof, when only part to be utilized for highway purposes.

In acquiring rights-of-way for highway construction, reconstruction, or improvement, and lands incidental to such construction, reconstruction, or improvement, the Commissioner of Highways is authorized and empowered, whenever a portion of a tract of land is to be utilized for right-of-way or a purpose incidental to the construction, reconstruction, or improvement of a public highway, to acquire by purchase, gift, or the exercise of the power of eminent domain the entire tract of land or any part thereof whenever (i) the remainder of such tract or part thereof can no longer be utilized for the purpose for which the entire tract is then being utilized; (ii) a portion of a building is to be taken; (iii) the cost of removal or relocation of the buildings or other improvements on the remaining portion necessitated by the taking would exceed the cost of destroying such buildings or other improvements; (iv) the highway project will leave the remaining portions without a means of access to a public highway; or (v) in the judgment of the Commissioner of Highways the resulting damages to the remainder of such tract or part thereof lying outside the proposed right-of-way, or the area being acquired for a purpose incidental to the construction, reconstruction, or improvement of a public highway, will approximate or equal the fair market value of such remaining lands. However, the Commissioner of Highways shall not acquire the remainder of such tracts by purchase where the remaining portion is in excess of 10 acres or by condemnation where the remaining portion is in excess of two acres. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as preventing the Commissioner of Highways from complying, where applicable, with the provisions of §

25.1-417

.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-117.2; 1960, c. 546; 1964, c. 262; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-91; 1973, c. 166; 2003, c. 940; 2014, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to condemnation proceedings by localities generally, see §

15.2-1902

.

§ 33.2-1008.
Authority to acquire land to replace parkland; applicability.

For the purposes of this section, “parkland” only includes parks and recreational areas under the jurisdiction of state agencies or local governing bodies. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this title, the Commissioner of Highways may acquire by gift or purchase any property without a permanent residential structure, or an interest in property, needed to replace parkland that is acquired for the improvement, maintenance, construction, or reconstruction of highways. Land acquired to replace parkland shall be abutting or appurtenant to the property of rights-of-way acquired for the improvement, maintenance, construction, or reconstruction of highways. Before exercising the authority granted by this section, the Commissioner of Highways shall notify the local governing body or state agency having jurisdiction over the parkland and shall obtain the concurrence of the local governing body or state agency that replacement parklands should be acquired and conveyed to the local governing body or state agency in exchange for the parkland needed for the improvement, maintenance, construction, or reconstruction of the highway.

The provisions of this section shall apply only in Albemarle County and the City of Charlottesville.

History.

2000, c. 310, § 33.1-91.1; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1009.
Acquisition of residue parcels declared to be in public interest.

The acquisition of such residue parcels in addition to the lands necessary for the immediate use for highway rights-of-way or purposes incidental to the construction, reconstruction, or improvement of public highways is hereby declared to be in the public interest and constitutes a public use as the term public uses is used in Article I, Section 11 of the Constitution of Virginia.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-117.3; 1960, c. 546; 1964, c. 262; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-92; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 1; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1010.
Use and disposition of residue parcels of land.

The Commissioner of Highways may lease, sell, or exchange such residue parcels of land upon such terms and conditions as in the judgment of the Commissioner of Highways may be in the public interest, provided, however, that the Commissioner of Highways shall not use such parcels for any commercial purpose. The Commissioner of Highways may lease, sell, or exchange such residue parcels of land as may have been acquired under the provisions of the Transportation Development and Revenue Bond Act (§

33.2-1700

et seq.), upon such terms and conditions as in the judgment of the Commissioner of Highways may be in the public interest. The Commissioner of Highways may lease such parcels of land as may have been acquired under the provisions of §

33.2-1005

in the event the former owner fails to make the request authorized under §

33.2-1005

to persons other than the former owner, upon such terms and conditions as in the judgment of the Commissioner of Highways may be in the public interest. The provisions of Articles 1 (§

33.2-900

et seq.) and 2 (§

33.2-908

et seq.) of Chapter 9 shall not be construed to apply to the disposition of land authorized in this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-117.4; 1960, c. 546; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-93; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1011.
Right to enter on land to ascertain its suitability for highway and other transportation purposes; damage resulting from such entry.

The Commissioner of Highways, through his duly authorized officers, agents, or employees, may enter upon any land in the Commonwealth for the purposes of making examination and survey thereof, including photographing; testing, including soil borings or testing for contamination; making appraisals; and taking such actions as may be necessary or desirable to determine its suitability for highway and other transportation purposes or for any other purpose incidental thereto. Such officers, agents, or servants shall exercise care to protect any improvements, growing crops, or timber in making such examination or survey. Such officers, agents, or servants may enter upon any property without the written permission of its owners if the Commissioner has requested the owner’s permission to inspect the property as provided in subsection B.

A request for permission to inspect shall (i) be on the Commissioner’s official letterhead and signed by an authorized officer, agent, or employee of the Commissioner; (ii) be sent to the owner by certified mail, return receipt requested, delivered by guaranteed overnight courier, or otherwise delivered to the owner in person with proof of delivery; (iii) be made not less than 30 days prior to the first date of the proposed inspection; (iv) notify the owner that if permission is withheld, the Commissioner or his duly authorized officers, agents, or employees shall be permitted to enter the property on the date of the proposed inspection. A mere citation of this section number of the Code of Virginia shall not satisfy the requirements of clause (iv). A request for permission to inspect shall be deemed to be made on the date of mailing, if mailed, or otherwise on the date of delivery.
B. 1. A request for permission to inspect shall (i) be on the Commissioner’s official letterhead and signed by an authorized officer, agent, or employee of the Commissioner; (ii) be sent to the owner by certified mail, return receipt requested, delivered by guaranteed overnight courier, or otherwise delivered to the owner in person with proof of delivery; (iii) be made not less than 30 days prior to the first date of the proposed inspection; (iv) notify the owner that if permission is withheld, the Commissioner or his duly authorized officers, agents, or employees shall be permitted to enter the property on the date of the proposed inspection. A mere citation of this section number of the Code of Virginia shall not satisfy the requirements of clause (iv). A request for permission to inspect shall be deemed to be made on the date of mailing, if mailed, or otherwise on the date of delivery.

A request for permission to inspect shall include (i) the specific date or dates such inspection is proposed to be made; (ii) the name of the entity entering the property; (iii) the number of persons for whom permission is sought; (iv) the purpose for which entry is made; and (v) the testing, appraisals, or examinations to be performed and other actions to be taken.

If a request for permission is provided in accordance with subdivision 1, the Commissioner or his duly authorized officer, agent, or employee may enter the property sooner than the 30 days indicated in the request only if the owner provides permission, in writing, to enter on an earlier date.

Any entry authorized by this section (i) shall be for the purpose of making surveys, tests, appraisals, or examinations thereof in order to determine the suitability of such property for the project and (ii) shall not be deemed a trespass.

The Commissioner shall make reimbursement for any actual damages resulting from entry upon the property. In any action filed under this section, the court may award the owner his reasonable (i) attorney fees, (ii) court costs, and (iii) fees for up to three experts or as many experts as are called by the condemnor, whichever is greater, who testified at trial if the court finds that the Commissioner damaged the owner’s property. A proceeding under this subsection shall not preclude the owner from pursuing any additional remedies available at law or equity.

The requirements of this section shall not apply to the practice of land surveying, as defined in § 54.1-400, when such surveying is not involved in any eminent domain or any proposed eminent domain matter.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-57.2; 1960, c. 491; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-94; 2007, c. 755; 2011, c. 60; 2014, c. 805; 2019, c. 788; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 60.

Cross references.

As to condemnation proceedings by localities generally, see §

15.2-1902

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2019, c. 788, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to condemnation proceedings in which the petitioner filed, prior to July 1, 2019, (i) a petition in condemnation pursuant to Chapter 2 ( §

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1 of the Code of Virginia or (ii) a certificate of take or deposit pursuant to Title 33.2 or Chapter 3 ( §

25.1-300

et seq.) of Title 25.1 of the Code of Virginia. Any condemnation proceedings in which the petitioner filed a petition or certificate described in clause (i) or (ii) on or after July 1, 2005, and prior to July 1, 2019, shall be governed by the provisions of the Code of Virginia in effect prior to July 1, 2019.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 788 rewrote this section. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, c. 60, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, deleted the clause (i) designation and clauses (ii) and (iii), which read “(ii) the owner’s written permission is not received prior to the date entry is proposed, and (iii) the petitioner has given the owner notice of intent to enter as provided in subsection C”; in subdivision B 1, inserted clauses (i) and (iv), in clause (iii), substituted “30 days prior” for “15 days prior,” and added the second sentence; added subdivision B 3; and deleted former subsection C relating to notice of intent to enter, how such notice may be effectuated, and the content of such notice; and made related changes.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). 6-404 Certificate of Take; 6-405 Certificate of Take — Another Form; No. 6-421 Restraining Order Against Defendant.

§ 33.2-1012.
Limitations in Title 25.1 not applicable to Commissioner of Highways.

Except as to procedure, the Commissioner of Highways shall not be subject to any limitations in Title 25.1 in exercising the power of eminent domain pursuant to this title.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-57.3; 1964, Ex. Sess., c. 23; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-95; 1972, c. 765; 2003, c. 940; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1013.
Notice of exercise of eminent domain power; evidence of value.

As used in this section:“Fair market value” means the price that the real property would bring if it were offered for sale by one who wanted to sell, but was under no necessity, and was bought by one who wanted to buy, but was under no necessity.“Owner” means any person owning an estate or interest in buildings, structures, or other improvements on real property, which estate or interest is recorded in the official records of the circuit court where the property is located, or improvements for which a permit has been issued by the Commissioner of Highways pursuant to §

33.2-1208

. “Owner” does not include trustees or beneficiaries under a deed of trust or any person owning only a security interest in the real property.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this chapter or in Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1:

The Commissioner of Highways shall notify every owner, as defined in this section, of a building, structure, or other improvement if the Commissioner of Highways intends to exercise the power of eminent domain in a manner that would result in a taking of the building, structure, or other improvement.

The owner of any such building, structure, or other improvement may present evidence of the fair market value of such building, structure, or other improvement in the proceedings described in §

25.1-233

, provided such owner has filed a petition for intervention pursuant to §

25.1-218

.

If the owner of such building, structure, or improvement is different from the owner of the underlying land, then such owner shall not be allowed to proffer any evidence of value that the owner of the underlying land would not be permitted to proffer if the building, structure, or improvement were owned by the owner of the underlying land; and

The provisions of this section shall not apply to condemnation proceedings in which the petition for condemnation was filed prior to July 1, 2000.

History.

2000, cc. 822, 843, § 33.1-95.1; 2003, c. 940; 2014, c. 805.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Outdoor advertising signs must be valued using fair market valuation. —

The Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner is required to value outdoor advertising signs in eminent domain cases using the fair market valuation set forth in the statute. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable H. Morgan Griffith, Member, House of Delegates, 01-104 (12/20/01) (decided under prior law).

§ 33.2-1014.
Acquisition of interests for exchange with railroad, public utility company, public service corporation or company, political subdivision, or cable television company; relocation of poles, lines, etc.

Whenever any railroad, public utility company, public service corporation or company, political subdivision, or cable television company owns or occupies any privately owned land either under a claim of right or with the apparent acquiescence of the private landowner which the Commissioner of Highways deems necessary and intends to acquire for any highway project, and such land owned or occupied by the railroad, public utility company, public service corporation or company, political subdivision, or cable television company is devoted to a public use, the Commissioner of Highways may acquire by gift, purchase, or by the exercise of the power of eminent domain additional land or easement, right-of-way, or interest in land adjacent to or approximately adjacent to such land needed and proposed to be acquired for such highway project and may then convey the same to the railroad, public utility company, public service corporation or company, political subdivision, or cable television company for use by it in lieu of the land theretofore owned or occupied by it but needed by the Commissioner of Highways for such highway project. The condemnation of such land, easement, right-of-way, or other interest in land to be conveyed to any railroad, public utility company, public service corporation or company, political subdivision, or cable television company shall be governed by the procedure prescribed by this article and may be carried out at the same time if against the same property owner and if against the same landowner or in the same proceedings in which land is condemned for highway purposes. The Commissioner of Highways may, under the same procedure and conditions prescribed by this article, with respect to property needed for highway purposes, enter upon and take possession of such property to be conveyed to any railroad, public utility company, public service corporation or company, political subdivision, or cable television company in the manner provided in §§

33.2-1018

through

33.2-1027

and proceed with the relocation of the installations of the railroad or public utility company in order that the construction of the highway project may be carried out without delay.

After the acquisition of the land owned or occupied by railroads, public utility companies, public service corporations or companies, political subdivisions, or cable television companies and the acquisition of the additional land, easement, right-of-way, or other interest in land for such railroads, utility companies, public service corporations or companies, political subdivisions, or cable television companies as provided in this section, in the event the poles, lines, or other facilities are not removed by such railroads or utility companies within 60 days from the date of the taking by the Commissioner of Highways, the Commissioner of Highways is vested with the power to remove and relocate such facilities at his own cost.

Any conveyance previously made by the Commissioner of Highways in exchange for land that was needed for a highway project is hereby declared to be valid and effective in all respects.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-58; 1960, c. 491; 1968, c. 227; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-96; 1976, c. 380; 1990, c. 242; 2014, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to condemnation proceedings by localities generally, see §

15.2-1902

.

§ 33.2-1015.
Acquisition of land in median of highways for public mass transit; disposition of such property.

When acquiring land for the construction of highways with divided roadways, the Commissioner of Highways may, if he deems it necessary and appropriate, also acquire by gift, purchase, or by the exercise of the power of eminent domain as vested in him by §

33.2-1001

, in addition to the land necessary for such highways, sufficient land in the median for use for public mass transit and may convey or otherwise make available the same to a public agency or authority or public service corporation or public service company for the construction and operation thereon of public facilities for mass transit.

Such additional land shall be acquired only after an agreement has been made between the Commissioner of Highways and a public agency or authority or public service corporation or public service company whereby such agency, authority, corporation, or company has agreed to pay the cost of the additional land acquired and all expense incidental to its acquisition.

The condemnation of such land to be conveyed for use for public mass transit shall be governed by the procedure prescribed by this article and may be carried out at the same time if against the same property owner and if against the same landowner or in the same proceedings in which land is condemned for highway purposes. The Commissioner of Highways may, under the same procedure and conditions prescribed by this article with respect to property needed for highway purposes, enter upon and take possession of such property to be conveyed to a public agency or authority or public service corporation or public service company in the manner provided in §§

33.2-1018

through

33.2-1027

.

The Board is authorized and directed with the consent of the Federal Highway Administration to permit the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority to commence construction of rapid transit and ancillary facilities within the proposed median of Interstate 66 between Glebe Road in Arlington County and Nutley Road in Fairfax County, provided that (i) construction of rapid transit shall conform with highway plans and that construction procedures shall be reviewed and approved by the Commissioner of Highways and (ii) prior to construction of rapid transit, a mutually satisfactory allocation of cost shall be agreed to by the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority, the Board, and the Federal Highway Administration.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-58.1; 1962, c. 303; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-97; 1973, c. 508; 2014, c. 805.